Maryland, session 2025, HB1081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–810.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY HARASS, INTIMIDATE, OR
THREATEN A PERSON:
(1) WHILE HIDING OR CONCEALING THEIR FACE WITH A MASK OR ANY
OTHER ARTICLE OR DEVICE WITH THE PURPOSE OF CONCEALING THE PERSON’S
IDENTITY; AND
(2) WITH THE INTENT TO PLACE ANOTHER PERSON IN REASONABLE
FEAR OF THEIR PHYSICAL SAFETY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1081*

HOUSE BILL 1081
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS
OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 180 DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A CONVICTION UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT MERGE WITH A CONVICTION FOR ANY OTHER CRIME BASED ON
THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE SEPARATE FROM
AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR ANY CRIME BASED
ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(E) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE IN A PROCEEDING UNDER THIS
SECTION THAT THE PERSON WAS:
(1) WEARING A MASK OR FACE COVERING IN CELEBRATION OF A
HOLIDAY, CELEBRATION, OR OTHER EVENT WHERE MASKS OR FACE COVERINGS ARE
TRADITIONALLY WORN;
(2) WEARING A MASK, HOOD, ARTICLE, OR OTHER DEVICE AS
PERSONAL PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT AS PART OF THE PERSON’S OCCUPATION,
TRADE, OR PROFESSION;
(3) WEARING A MASK, HOOD, ARTICLE, OR OTHER DEVICE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF PROTECTION FROM WEATHER ELEMENTS OR WHILE PARTICIPATING IN
A WINTER SPORT;
(4) WEARING A MASK, HOOD, ARTICLE, OR OTHER DEVICE IN AN
ARTISTIC OR THEATRICAL PRODUCTION OR CELEBRATION;
(5) WEARING A GAS MASK OR OTHER PROTECTIVE FACIAL COVERING
FOR THE PURPOSES OF PROTECTION DURING OR RELATING TO AN EMERGENCY
SITUATION OR DURING AN EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DRILL;
(6) WEARING A MASK TO LIMIT THE SPREAD OF AIRBORNE ILLNESSES;
OR
(7) WEARING ANY GARMENT FOR RELIGIOUS PURPOSES.

HOUSE BILL 1081 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.